Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1191.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 2710. Prohibition on blocking of crossings.A railroad owner or operator may not allow for the blocking of a railroad/highway grade crossing that results in the delay of an emergency vehicle from assisting a person or property in distress for more than five minutes. The commission shall assess <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 a civil penalty of $10,000 for each violation of this section.§ 2711. Limitation on length of freight or work trains.A railroad operating on a main track or branch line in this Commonwealth may not run, or permit to be run, a freight or work train which exceeds 8,500 feet in length on any part of the main track or branch line.§ 2712. Authorization to monitor safety practices and operations by collective bargaining representatives.The collective bargaining representative for each craft of railroad employee and the State director or representative for each craft of railroad employee shall be permitted to monitor the safety practices and operations of a railroad operating in this Commonwealth. The collective bargaining representative or State director or representative may accompany the commission during an investigation or inspection of a railroad safety matter. In monitoring the safety practices and operations of a railroad under this section, the collective bargaining representative or State director or representative may take photographs and conduct an investigation on railroad property as may be necessary for the purpose of ensuring compliance with Federal or State laws and regulations , as well as take photographs and conduct an investigation of a safety hazard that may result in injury or death to a railroad employee. Any information, data, evidence or photographs collected by the monitoring of the safety practices and operations of a railroad under this section may not be disseminated except in furtherance of an official investigation related to a potential violation of Federal or State laws and regulations. A railroad may not ass ert that the collective bargaining representative or State director or representative is trespassing on railroad property during an 20250HB1191PN3068 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation authorized under this section.§ 2713. Safe staffing levels for trains or light engines.(a) Staffing levels.--A train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight in this Commonwealth shall have a crew that consists of at least two individuals. A superintendent, trainmaster or other employee of a railroad may not order or otherwise require a train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight to be operated unless the train or light engine has a crew that consists of at least two individuals.(b) Construction.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a Class II or III railroad as defined by the United States Surface Transportation Board on the effective date of this subsection and shall be construed to relate only to safety, including ensuring that no train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight is left without a functional crew member as a result of a medical emergency.(c) Penalties.--The commission may assess a civil penalty against a person who willfully violates subsection (a) in accordance with the following:(1) If, within three years of the violation, the commission has not previously assessed a civil penalty against the person under this subsection, the commission may impose a civil penalty of not less than $1,000, but not more than $5,000.(2) If, within three years of the violation, the commission has previously assessed one civil penalty against the person under this subsection, the commission may impose a civil penalty of not less than $5,000, but not more than $10,000.20250HB1191PN3068 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If, within three years of the violation, the commission has previously assessed two or more civil penalties against the person under this subsection, the commission may impose a civil penalty of not less than $10,000, but not more than $25,000.(d) Enforcement.--The Attorney General, upon the request of the commission, shall bring a civil action to collect the penalties specified under subsection (c). The State Treasurer shall deposit all of the money collected from the civil penalties imposed under this section into the General Fund.(e) De finitions.--As used in this section, the term "train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight" does not include hostler service or utility employees.§ 2714. Wayside detector systems.(a) System requirements.--The commission, in consultation with the department, shall work with a railroad operating in this Commonwealth to certify that wayside detector systems are located and functional on tracks where the railroad operates that are classified as Class IV or greater by the Federal Railroad Administration on the effective date of this subsection . The railroad shall ensure that the following requirements are met:(1) The wayside detector systems shall be properly installed, maintained, repaired and operational in accordance with the guidelines issued by the United States Department of Transportation and th e Federal Railroad Administration. (2) Any expired, nonworking or outdated wayside detector system or its component parts shall be removed and replaced with new parts or an entirely new wayside detector system.(3) The distance between wayside detector systems shall 20250HB1191PN3068 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be appropriate, when accounting for the natural terrain surrounding a track where the railroad operates and the safety of the trains, rolling stock, on-track equipment, their operators, their passengers and the persons and property in the vicinity of the track, to provide an operator of a train with sufficient time to do any of the following if a defect is detected:(i) Respond to an alert projected by a wayside detector system.(ii) Stop the train, rolling stock or on-track equipment, if necessary.(iii) Make necessary repairs or, if a repair is impossible at the location, remove the component parts or equipment that is defective.(4) The railroad shall have defined, written standards and training for railroad employees pertaining to wayside detector system defect alerts, the course of action that railroad employees are required to take to respond to the alerts and appropriate monitoring and responses by the railroad if railroad employees fail to take the required course of action.(b) Refusal to cooperate.--If a railroad refuses to work or otherwise cooperate with the commission in good faith under subsection (a), the commission shall investigate the railroad's safety practices and standards in accordance with 49 CFR Pt. 212 (relating to State safety participation regulations). The commission shall determine whether the railroad appears to be in compliance with Federal railroad safety laws as defined in 49 CFR 209.3 (relating to definitions) . (c) Noncompliance.--If a railroad does not appear to be in 20250HB1191PN3068 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compliance with Federal railroad safety laws based on an investigation conducted under subsection (b), no later than 60 days after the conclusion of the investigation, the commission shall make a report to the Federal Railroad Administration. The report shall detail the results of the investigation and recommend that the Federal Railroad Administration take enforcement action within the Federal Railroad Administration's authority against the railroad for the safety violations discovered through the investigation. The commission shall send a copy of the report to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(4) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(5) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(d) Notice of defects.--When a wayside detector system detects a defect in a passing train, rolling stock, on-track equipment or its component equipment and parts, if the message regarding the defect is not immediately sent to the operator of the train, rolling stock or on-track equipment, the person who receives the message shall immediately notify the operator of the train, rolling stock or on-track equipment of the defect. The commission shall ensure that the manner in which a wayside detector system message is sent and received complies with this subsection.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Defect." Any of the following:(1) A hot wheel bearing.20250HB1191PN3068 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A hot wheel.(3) A defective bearing that is detected through acoustics.(4) Dragging equipment.(5) Excessive height or weight.(6) A shifted load.(7) A low hose.(8) A rail temperature defect.(9) A wheel condition defect."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Wayside detector system." An electronic device or a series of connected devices that scan passing trains, rolling stock, on-track equipment and their component equipment and parts for defects.§ 2715. Study of transportation of hazardous materials or waste.(a) Examination of Federal and State laws.--The commission, in consultation with the department, shall examine current Federal and State laws regarding the following:(1) The regulations and protocols pertaining to the transportation of hazardous materials and hazardous waste by railroads.(2) The requirements pertaining to when, how and to whom the transportation of hazardous materials and hazardous waste by railroads shall be disclosed.(b) Report.--The commission, in consultation with the department, shall compile the information examined under subsection (a) into a report. The report shall include recommendations regarding the following:20250HB1191PN3068 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Methods to strengthen the Commonwealth's safety requirements for the transportation of hazardous materials and hazardous waste by railroads.(2) Appropriate enhancements to current civil and criminal penalties relating to the transportation of hazardous materials and hazardous waste by railroads, including penalties for the following:(i) The mishandling of hazardous materials and hazardous waste.(ii) Failing to disclose or failing to meet all disclosure requirements relating to the transportation of hazardous materials and hazardous waste.(c) Submission.--No later than 90 days after the effective date of this subsection, the commission, in consultation with the department, shall submit the report required under subsection (b) to all of the following:(1) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(2) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Transportation o f the Commonwealth.§ 2716. Reporting system for transportation of hazardous materials or waste.The commission shall promulgate regulations to create a reporting system for the transportation of hazardous materials and waste by railroads within this Commonwealth. The information 20250HB1191PN3068 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contained in the reporting system shall not be made public or otherwise be accessible under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, but the commission shall make the information available via a secure online database accessible only to the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency and county emergency management agencies.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.§ 2717. HAZARD IMPACT ASSESSMENT.(A) SUBMISSION.--IN ADDITION TO ANY REQUIREMENTS UNDER SECTION 2702 (RELATING TO CONSTRUCTION, RELOCATION, SUSPENSION AND ABOLITION OF CROSSINGS), NO RAIL CARRIER MAY CONSTRUCT A NEW RAILYARD OR EXPAND AN EXISTING RAILYARD WITHOUT FIRST SUBMITTING A HAZARD IMPACT ASSESSMENT TO THE COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION IF THE CONSTRUCTION OR EXPANSION OF THE RAILYARD AFFECTS THE TRAFFIC PATTERNS OR SAFETY OF A PUBLIC GRADE CROSSING.(B) SCOPE.--THE HAZARD IMPACT ASSESSMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE IMPACT OF THE FACILITY ON PUBLIC ROADWAY SAFETY AND SHALL INCLUDE:(1) AN ANALYSIS OF PROJECTED VEHICULAR TRAFFIC VOLUMES AT ALL GRADE CROSSINGS WITHIN A ONE-MILE RADIUS OF THE FACILITY.(2) IDENTIFICATION OF HIGH-RISK INTERSECTIONS, INCLUDING:(I) SIGHT LINE OBSTRUCTIONS DUE TO TOPOGRAPHY OR PERMANENT STRUCTURES.(II) RISKS OF VEHICULAR QUEUING ONTO TRACKS DUE TO NEARBY TRAFFIC SIGNALS.(III) REPEATED BLOCKAGE OF EMERGENCY RESPONSE 20250HB1191PN3068 - 9 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ROUTES.(C) MITIGATION PLAN.--IF THE HAZARD IMPACT ASSESSMENT IDENTIFIES A HIGH-RISK INTERSECTION, THE RAIL CARRIER SHALL INCLUDE A MITIGATION PLAN AS PART OF THE APPLICATION. THE PLAN SHALL DETAIL PHYSICAL IMPROVEMENTS TO MITIGATE THE IDENTIFIED HAZARDS, WHICH MAY INCLUDE:(1) INSTALLATION OF FOUR-QUADRANT GATES.(2) CONSTRUCTION OF GRADE SEPARATIONS.(3) IMPLEMENTATION OF ADVANCED TRAFFIC PREEMPTION SYSTEMS CONNECTED TO HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SIGNALS.(D) VIOLATION.--A RAIL CARRIER THAT FAILS TO SUBMIT THE HAZARD IMPACT ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION OR FAILS TO IMPLEMENT A COMMISSION-APPROVED MITIGATION PLAN COMMITS A VIOLATION OF THIS CHAPTER AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PENALTIES UNDER CHAPTER 33 (RELATING TO VIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES).(E) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"HAZARD IMPACT ASSESSMENT." A COMPREHENSIVE STUDY EVALUATING THE POTENTIAL IMPACT OF RAILROAD INFRASTRUCTURE CHANGES ON PUBLIC ROADWAY SAFETY, EMERGENCY RESPONSE ACCESS AND GRADE CROSSING MECHANICS."HIGH-RISK INTERSECTION." A GRADE CROSSING IDENTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION WHERE GEOMETRIC, TOPOGRAPHIC OR TRAFFIC VOLUME FACTORS CREATE A HEIGHTENED PROBABILITY OF ACCIDENTS OR VEHICLE ENTRAPMENT OR OTHERWISE WOULD CREATE AN IMMEDIATE DANGER TO THE SAFETY AND WELFARE OF THE PUBLIC."RAILYARD." A SYSTEM OF TRACKS WITHIN DEFINED LIMITS PROVIDED FOR THE MAKING UP OF TRAINS, STORING OF CARS AND OTHER PURPOSES, WHICH INVOLVES SWITCHING MOVEMENTS.20250HB1191PN3068 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 2. THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT ARE SEVERABLE. IF ANY PROVISION OF THIS ACT OR ITS APPLICATION TO ANY PERSON OR CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD INVALID, THE INVALIDITY SHALL NOT AFFECT OTHER PROVISIONS OR APPLICATIONS OF THIS ACT WHICH CAN BE GIVEN EFFECT WITHOUT THE INVALID PROVISION OR APPLICATION.SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF 66 PA.C.S. § 2717 SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.(2) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 180 DAYS.20250HB1191PN3068 - 11 - 1234567891011